Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 4

Criminal Investigation Division

4-7-401. Creation.

There is created the criminal investigation division within the Tennessee highway patrol, referred to as “CID” in this part.

Acts 2006, ch. 879, § 1.

4-7-402. Purpose — Jurisdiction.

The mission of the CID shall be to investigate, gather evidence and assist federal, state and local law enforcement in the prosecution of criminal offenses enumerated in § 4-7-404(3).

The CID shall have original jurisdiction to enforce title 55, chapter 5, relative to automobile anti-theft, odometer and fraud prevention, as well as all criminal matters initiated by the highway patrol or other divisions of the department of safety, including, but not limited to, the investigation of vehicular homicides, vehicular assaults and traffic crashes involving death or serious bodily injury.

Acts 2006, ch. 879, § 1.

4-7-403. Staffing.

The CID shall be staffed in an appropriate and professional manner to carry out its duties and functions. Such staffing shall be in the discretion of the commissioner of safety.

Acts 2006, ch. 879, § 1.

4-7-404. Authority.

Members of the CID shall have the authority to:

Provide investigative and technical support to the highway patrol in all criminal matters initiated by their actions;

Provide investigative and technical support to the driver license division of the department of safety;

Conduct overt and covert criminal investigations relating to:

Motor vehicle and motorized vehicle theft;

Stolen motor vehicles and motorized vehicle parts;

Stolen boats, airplanes and parts therefrom;

Violation of title and registration laws and operation of chop shops in title 55, chapter 5;

Identify theft laws;

Odometer fraud;

Vehicular homicides;

Vehicular assault; and

Insurance fraud related to motor vehicles; and

Provide technical and investigative support to the internal affairs division of the department of safety.

Acts 2006, ch. 879, § 1.

4-7-405. Assisting the TBI.

The CID may also assist the Tennessee bureau of investigation (TBI) in any other criminal investigations not specified in §4-7-404, upon written request by the director of the TBI and approval of the commissioner of safety.

Acts 2006, ch. 879, § 1.

4-7-117. Monthly payment to be used for medical care of retired canine in care of highway patrol officer.

4-7-120. Political activity.